Utah statutes.
70C-8-203.   Fees -- Examinations.

(1)  A party required to file notification under Section 70C-8-202 shall, on or before January 31 of each year, pay to the department an annual fee equal to the sum of:

(a)  $25; and

(b)  $7 for each $100,000 or part thereof in excess of $100,000, of the original principal balance of all consumer credit the party extended during the preceding calendar year.

(2)  In addition to filing notification, a party subject to this part, and a depository institution subject to this title:

(a)  may be required to make a book or record relating to a consumer credit transaction available to the department or its authorized representative for examination; and

(b)  shall pay to the department a fee to be set by the department based on an hourly rate per each examiner.

(3)  No portion of a fee paid or owed to the department under this part is refundable because a party voluntarily or involuntarily ceases to extend credit to consumers:

(a)  during the period covered by the fee; or

(b)  before the time of an examination by the department of a book or record pertaining to a preceding consumer credit transaction.

